Washington statutes.
RCW 19.16.351

Additional powers and duties of board.

The board, in addition to any other powers and duties granted under this chapter and RCW 18.235.030:

(1) May adopt, amend, and rescind rules for its own organization and procedure and other rules as it may deem necessary in order to perform its duties under this chapter.

(2) May inquire into the needs of the collection agency business, the needs of the director, and the matter of the policy of the director in administering this chapter, and make such recommendations with respect thereto as, after consideration, may be deemed important and necessary for the welfare of the state, the welfare of the public, and the welfare and progress of the collection agency business.

(3) Upon request of the director, confer and advise in matters relating to the administering of this chapter.

(4) May consider and make appropriate recommendations to the director in all matters referred to the board.

(5) Upon request of the director, confer with and advise the director in the preparation of any rules to be adopted, amended, or repealed.

(6) May assist the director in the collection of such information and data as the director may deem necessary to the proper administration of this chapter.

[ 2002 c 86 s 267; 1977 ex.s. c 194 s 2; 1973 1st ex.s. c 20 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.